Washington statutes.
RCW 16.04.015

Damages, liability.

Except as provided under RCW 16.04.100, whenever any animals trespass as provided in RCW 16.04.010, the owner or person having possession of such animal shall be liable for all damages the owner or occupant may sustain by reason of such trespass.

[ 1994 c 263 s 1; 1989 c 286 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.